Washington statutes.
RCW 9.86.040

Application of provisions.

This chapter shall not apply to any act permitted by the statutes of the United States or of this state, or by the United States army and navy regulations, nor shall it apply to any printed or written document or production, stationery, ornament, picture or jewelry whereon shall be depicted said flag, standard, color, ensign or shield with no design or words thereon and disconnected with any advertisement.

[ 1919 c 107 s 4; RRS s 2675-4.]